Nebraska, session 109, LB678.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB678 LB678
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $XXX from the General
Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $XXX from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to
the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, for Program 48, for
salary increases required by negotiated agreements with the Nebraska
Association of Public Employees, the State College Education Association,
and the Nebraska State College System Professional Association, for
minimum wage increases required by the Wage and Hour Act, and for
increases in health insurance premiums.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-